South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5240.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-1-180(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) A special restricted driver's license is valid only in the operation vehicles during daylight hours. The holder of a special restricted driver's license must be accompanied by a licensed adult, twenty-one years of age or older after six o'clock p.m. or eight o'clock p.m. during daylight saving time. The holder of a special restricted driver's license may not drive between midnight and six five o'clock a.m. unless accompanied by any licensed individual listed in Section 56-1-100(A)(1-7). The accompanying driver must: (1) occupy a seat beside the conditional license holder when the conditional license holder is operating a motor vehicle; or (2) be within a safe viewing distance of the conditional license holder when the conditional license holder is operating a motorcycle or a moped. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----